Illinois, session 104th, HB5547.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-190 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-190 new)7    Sec. 15-190. Child sex offender ineligible.8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning 9in taxable year 2027, no property that is used as the primary 10residence of a child sex offender during the taxable year may 11receive a homestead exemption under this Article 15. 12    (b) As used in this Section: 13    "Child sex offender" means any person who: 14        (1) has been charged under Illinois law, or any 15    substantially similar federal law or law of another state, 16    with a sex offense or the attempt to commit a sex offense 17    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age at the 18    time of the offense; and: 19            (A) is convicted of the offense or an attempt to 20        commit such offense; 21            (B) is found not guilty of the offense or the 22        attempt to commit the offense by reason of insanity; 23            (C) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an   HB5547- 2 -LRB104 20101 HLH 33552 b1        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 2        subsection (a) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 3        Criminal Procedure of 1963 for the alleged commission 4        or attempted commission of such offense; 5            (D) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 6        following a hearing conducted pursuant to a federal 7        law or the law of another state substantially similar 8        to subsection (c) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 9        Criminal Procedure of 1963 of the offense or of the 10        attempted commission of the offense; or 11            (E) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 12        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to a federal 13        law or the law of another state substantially similar 14        to subsection (a) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 15        Criminal Procedure of 1963 for the alleged violation 16        or attempted commission of such offense; or 17        (2) is certified as a sexually dangerous person 18    pursuant to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons Act, 19    or any substantially similar federal law or the law of 20    another state, when any conduct giving rise to such 21    certification is committed or attempted against a person 22    less than 18 years of age; or 23        (3) is subject to the provisions of Section 2 of the 24    Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act. 25    Convictions that result from or are connected with the 26same act, or result from offenses committed at the same time,   HB5547- 3 -LRB104 20101 HLH 33552 b1shall be counted for the purpose of this Section as one 2conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law is not a 3conviction for purposes of this Section. 4    "Sex offense", except as otherwise provided in this 5Section, means: 6        (1) A violation of any of the following Sections of 7    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012: 8    10-4 (forcible detention), 10-7 (aiding or abetting child 9    abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 10-5(b)(10) (child 10    luring), 11-1.40 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 11    child), 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child), 11-6.5 12    (indecent solicitation of an adult), 11-9.1 (sexual 13    exploitation of a child), 11-9.2 (custodial sexual 14    misconduct), 11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with 15    a disability), 11-11 (sexual relations within families), 16    11-14.3(a)(1) (promoting prostitution by advancing 17    prostitution), 11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting prostitution 18    by profiting from prostitution by compelling a person to 19    be a person engaged in the sex trade), 11-14.3(a)(2)(C) 20    (promoting prostitution by profiting from prostitution by 21    means other than as described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) 22    of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 23    11-14.4 (promoting commercial sexual exploitation of a 24    child), 11-18.1 (patronizing a sexually exploited child), 25    11-20.1 (child pornography or child sexual abuse 26    material), 11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 11-21   HB5547- 4 -LRB104 20101 HLH 33552 b1    (harmful material), 11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling to 2    meet a minor or traveling to meet a child), 12-33 3    (ritualized abuse of a child), 11-20 (obscenity) (when 4    that offense was committed in any school, on real property 5    comprising any school, in any conveyance owned, leased, or 6    contracted by a school to transport students to or from 7    school or a school related activity, or in a public park), 8    11-30 (public indecency) (when committed in a school, on 9    real property comprising a school, in any conveyance 10    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 11    students to or from school or a school related activity, 12    or in a public park) or an attempt to commit any of these 13    offenses. 14        (2) A violation of any of the following Sections of 15    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 16    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age: 11-1.20 17    (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 (aggravated criminal 18    sexual assault), 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse), 11-1.60 19    (aggravated criminal sexual abuse) or an attempt to commit 20    any of these offenses. 21        (3) A violation of any of the following Sections of 22    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 23    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age and the 24    defendant is not a parent of the victim: 25            (A) 10-1 (kidnapping); 26            (B) 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping);  HB5547- 5 -LRB104 20101 HLH 33552 b1            (C) 10-3 (unlawful restraint);2            (D) 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint);3            (E) 11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a 4        child); or5            (F) an attempt to commit any of these offenses; or 6        (4) A violation of any former law of this State 7    substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 8    paragraph (1) or (2) of this definition.